Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.120

Payment on death in line of duty.

Whenever any active firefighter or firefighter retired for disability shall die as the result of an accident or other fortuitous event occurring while in the performance of his or her duty, his widow or her widower may elect to accept a monthly pension equal to one-half the deceased firefighter's salary but in no case in excess of one hundred fifty dollars per month, or the sum of five thousand dollars cash. The right of election must be exercised within sixty days of the firefighter's death. If not so exercised, the pension benefits shall become fixed and shall be paid from the date of death. Such pension shall cease if, and when, he or she remarries. If there is no widow or widower, then such pension benefits shall be paid to his or her child or children.

[ 2007 c 218 s 27; 1973 1st ex.s. c 154 s 63; 1959 c 5 s 6; 1957 c 82 s 6. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 2, part; 1929 c 86 s 2, part; 1919 c 196 s 5, part; 1909 c 50 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Severability—1973 1st ex.s. c 154: See note following RCW 2.12.030.